Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
PART 4 PAROLE ELIGIBILITY AND DISCHARGE FROM CUSTODY
17-22.5-403.7. Parole eligibility - youthful offender - juvenile offender convicted as adult - definition.

As used in this section, "inmate" means a person:

Who is convicted as an adult of a felony following direct filing of an information or indictment in the district court pursuant to section 19-2.5-801;

Who is convicted as an adult of a felony following transfer of proceedings to the district court pursuant to section 19-2.5-802; or

Who is convicted as an adult of a felony offense and sentenced to the department when the offense for which the person convicted was committed when the person was eighteen years of age or older but less than twenty-one years of age; and

Who is sentenced to life imprisonment with the possibility of parole after serving a period of forty calendar years as provided in section 18-1.3-401 (4)(b), C.R.S.

After considering any relevant evidence presented by any person or agency and considering the presumptions set forth in section 17-34-102 (8), the governor may grant parole to an inmate prior to the inmate's parole eligibility date if, in the governor's opinion, extraordinary mitigating circumstances exist and the inmate's release from institutional custody is compatible with the safety and welfare of society. However, nothing in this section grants the governor the authority to grant early parole pursuant to the provisions of this section to an inmate serving a sentence of life without the possibility of parole.

Upon application for parole by an inmate, the state board of parole, working in conjunction with the department and using the guidelines established pursuant to section 17-22.5-404, shall determine whether to grant parole. If the state board of parole determines that placing the inmate on parole is appropriate, the inmate shall remain in the legal custody of the department of corrections for the remainder of his or her life. If an application for parole is refused by the state board of parole, the state board of parole shall reconsider within five years thereafter whether the inmate should be granted parole. The state board of parole shall continue such reconsideration at least once every five years thereafter until the inmate is granted parole.

If the state board of parole grants parole pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, the division of adult parole shall provide parole supervision and assistance in securing employment, housing, and such other services as may affect the successful reintegration of the inmate into the community while recognizing the need for public safety.

The conditions for parole for the inmate under this subsection (4) shall be established pursuant to section 17-22.5-404 by the state board of parole prior to the inmate's release from incarceration. Upon a determination that the conditions of parole have been violated in a parole revocation proceeding, the state board of parole shall:

Continue the parole in effect;

Modify the conditions of parole if circumstances then shown to exist require such modifications and set forth those circumstances in writing; or

Revoke the parole and order the return of the inmate to a place of confinement designated by the executive director for any period of time remaining on the inmate's sentence to incarceration.

An inmate who has been reincarcerated due to a parole revocation pursuant to this subsection (4) shall be eligible for parole at any time during the reincarceration.

If an inmate is subsequently reincarcerated pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (4) of this section, following reincarceration, the inmate may apply for parole and the state board of parole, working in conjunction with the department and using the guidelines established pursuant to section 17-22.5-404, shall determine whether to grant parole. If the state board of parole refuses the application for parole, the state board of parole shall reconsider within one year thereafter whether the inmate should be granted parole. The state board of parole shall continue such reconsideration each year thereafter, until the board grants the inmate parole.

If the state board of parole grants parole to an inmate pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (5), the provisions of subsection (4) of this section shall apply while the inmate is serving the remainder of the period of parole.

When an offender applies for early parole pursuant to this section after having successfully completed the specialized program described in section 17-34-102, the offender shall make his or her application to the governor's office with notice and a copy of the application sent to the state board of parole created in section 17-2-201. The state board of parole shall review the offender's application and all supporting documents and schedule a hearing if the board considers making a recommendation for early parole, at which hearing any victim must have the opportunity to be heard, pursuant to section 24-4.1-302.5 (1)(j), C.R.S. Not later than ninety days after receipt of a copy of an offender's application for early parole, the state board of parole, after considering the presumptions set forth in section 17-34-102 (8), shall make a recommendation to the governor concerning whether early parole should be granted to the offender.

The department, in consultation with the state board of parole, shall develop any necessary policies and procedures to implement this subsection (6), including procedures for providing notice to any victim, as required by sections 24-4.1-302.5 (1)(j) and 24-4.1-303 (14), C.R.S., and to the district attorney's office that prosecuted the crime for which the offender was sentenced.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1053, § 5, effective May 25.

L. 2016:

(2) amended and (6) added, (SB 16-180), ch. 352, p. 1444, § 4, effective August 10.

L. 2021:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, (HB 21-1209), ch. 448, p. 2951, § 4, effective September 7; (1)(a) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 717, § 35, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (1)(a) by HB 21-1209 and SB 21-059 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2006 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 228, Session Laws of Colorado 2006. For the legislative declaration in SB 16-180, see section 1 of chapter 352, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.

17-22.5-404. Parole guidelines - definition.

The general assembly hereby finds that:

The risk of reoffense shall be the central consideration by the state board of parole in making decisions related to the timing and conditions of release on parole or revocation of parole;

Research demonstrates that actuarial risk assessment tools can predict the likelihood or risk of reoffense with significantly greater accuracy than professional judgment alone. Evidence-based correctional practices prioritize the use of actuarial risk assessment tools to promote public safety. The best outcomes are derived from a combination of empirically based actuarial tools and clinical judgment.

Although the state board of parole is made up of individuals, using structured decision-making unites the parole board members with a common philosophy and set of goals and purposes while retaining the authority of individual parole board members to make decisions that are appropriate for particular situations. Evidence-based correctional practices support the use of structured decision-making.

Structured decision-making by the state board of parole provides for greater accountability, standards for evaluating outcomes, and transparency of decision-making that can be better communicated to victims, offenders, other criminal justice professionals, and the community; and

An offender's likelihood of success may be increased by aligning the intensity and type of parole supervision, conditions of release, and services with assessed risk and need level.

The division of criminal justice in the department of public safety shall develop the Colorado risk assessment scale to be used by the state board of parole in considering inmates for release on parole. The risk assessment scale shall include criteria that statistically have been shown to be good predictors of the risk of reoffense. The division of criminal justice shall validate the Colorado risk assessment scale at least every five years or more often if the predictive accuracy, as determined by data collection and analysis, falls below an acceptable level of predictive accuracy as determined by the division of criminal justice, the state board of parole, and the division of adult parole in the department of corrections.

The division of criminal justice, the department of corrections, and the state board of parole shall cooperate to develop parole board action forms consistent with this section that capture the rationale for decision-making that shall be published as official forms of the department of corrections. Victim identity and input shall be protected from display on the parole board action form or any parole hearing report that may become a part of an inmate record.

The division of criminal justice, in cooperation with the department of corrections and the state board of parole, shall provide training on the use of the administrative release guideline instrument developed pursuant to section 17-22.5-107 (1) and the Colorado risk assessment scale to personnel of the department of corrections, the state board of parole, administrative hearing officers, and release hearing officers. The division shall conduct the training on a semiannual basis.

The department of corrections, in cooperation with the state board of parole, shall provide training on the use of the administrative revocation guidelines developed pursuant to section 17-22.5-107 (2) to personnel of the department of corrections, the state board of parole, and administrative hearing officers. The department shall conduct the training semiannually.

For a person sentenced for a class 2, class 3, class 4, class 5, or class 6 felony or level 1, level 2, level 3, or level 4 drug felony who is eligible for parole pursuant to section 17-22.5-403, or a person who is eligible for parole pursuant to section 17-22.5-403.7, the state board of parole may consider all applications for parole, as well as all persons to be supervised under any interstate compact. The state board of parole may parole any person who is sentenced or committed to a correctional facility when the board determines, by using, where available, evidence-based practices and the guidelines established by this section, that there is a reasonable probability that the person will not violate the law while on parole and that the person's release from institutional custody is compatible with public safety and the welfare of society. The state board of parole shall first consider the risk of reoffense in every release decision it makes.

In considering offenders for parole, the state board of parole shall consider the totality of the circumstances, which include, but need not be limited to, the following factors:

The testimony or written statement from the victim of the crime, or a relative of the victim, or a designee, pursuant to section 17-2-214;

The actuarial risk of reoffense;

The offender's assessed criminogenic need level;

The offender's program or treatment participation and progress;

The offender's institutional conduct;

The adequacy of the offender's parole plan;

Whether the offender while under sentence has threatened or harassed the victim or the victim's family or has caused the victim or the victim's family to be threatened or harassed, either verbally or in writing;

Aggravating or mitigating factors from the criminal case;

The testimony or written statement from a prospective parole sponsor, employer, or other person who would be available to assist the offender if released on parole;

Whether the offender had previously absconded or escaped or attempted to abscond or escape while on community supervision; and

Whether the offender successfully completed or worked toward completing a high school diploma, a high school equivalency examination, as defined in section 22-33-102 (8.5), C.R.S., or a college degree during his or her period of incarceration.

The state board of parole shall use the Colorado risk assessment scale that is developed by the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of this section in considering inmates for release on parole.

Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c), the state board of parole shall also use the administrative release guideline instrument developed pursuant to section 17-22.5-107 (1) in evaluating an application for parole.

The administrative release guideline instrument shall not be used in considering those inmates classified as sex offenders with indeterminate sentences for whom the sex offender management board pursuant to section 18-1.3-1009, C.R.S., has established separate and distinct release guidelines. The sex offender management board in collaboration with the department of corrections, the judicial department, the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety, and the state board of parole shall develop a specific sex offender release guideline instrument for use by the state board of parole for those inmates classified as sex offenders with determinate sentences.

The seriousness of the technical violation, if applicable;

The parolee's frequency of technical violations, if applicable;

The parolee's efforts to comply with a previous corrective action plan or other remediation plan required by the state board of parole or parole officer;

The imposition of intermediate sanctions by the parole officer in response to the technical violations that may form the basis of the complaint for revocation; and

Whether modification of parole conditions is appropriate and consistent with public safety in lieu of revocation.

In conducting a parole revocation hearing, the state board of parole and the administrative hearing officer shall consider, where available, evidence-based practices and shall consider, but need not be limited to, the following factors:

(I) A determination by the state board of parole that a parolee committed a new crime while on parole, if applicable;

(II) The parolee's actuarial risk of reoffense;

The state board of parole shall use the administrative revocation guidelines developed pursuant to section 17-22.5-107 (2), in evaluating complaints filed for parole revocation.

The state board of parole or the administrative hearing officer shall not revoke parole for a technical violation unless the board or administrative hearing officer determines on the record that appropriate intermediate sanctions have been utilized and have been ineffective or that the modification of conditions of parole or the imposition of intermediate sanctions is not appropriate or consistent with public safety and the welfare of society.

The state board of parole shall work in consultation with the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety and the department of corrections to develop and implement a process to collect and analyze data related to the basis for and the outcomes of the board's parole decisions. The process shall collect data related to the board's rationale for granting, revoking, or denying parole. Any information relating to victim identification or victim input that is identifiable to an individual defendant or case shall be maintained, but kept confidential and released only to other government agencies, pursuant to a nondisclosure agreement, for the purpose of analysis and reporting, pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (6). When the board grants parole, the process shall also collect data related to whether the offender has previously recidivated, the type of reentry program given to the offender as a part of the offender's parole plan, and whether the offender recidivates while on parole.

The state board of parole shall also determine whether a decision granting, revoking, or denying parole conformed with or departed from the administrative guidelines created pursuant to section 17-22.5-107 and, if the decision was a departure from the guidelines, the reason for the departure. The data collected pursuant to this paragraph (b) are subject to the same victim protections described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (6).

The state board of parole shall provide the data collected pursuant to this subsection (6) to the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety for analysis. The division of criminal justice shall analyze the data received pursuant to this paragraph (c) and shall provide its analysis to the board. The board and the division of criminal justice shall use the data and analysis to identify specific factors that are important in the decision-making process.

The division of criminal justice in the department of public safety shall provide the state board of parole with training regarding how to use the data obtained and analyzed pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subsection (6) to facilitate the board's future decision-making.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a), C.R.S., on or before March 31, 2017, and on or before March 31 each year thereafter, the state board of parole and the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety shall issue a report to the general assembly regarding outcomes of decisions by the state board of parole. The data must be reported to the general assembly only in the aggregate.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (SB 11-241), ch. 200, p. 838, § 7, effective May 23, 2011.)

The department of corrections, the state board of parole, the division of adult parole, and the division of criminal justice in the department of public safety shall cooperate in implementing all aspects of this section.

This section shall apply to any person to whom section 17-22.5-303.5, as it existed prior to May 18, 1991, would apply pursuant to the operation of section 17-22.5-406, because the provisions of such sections are substantially similar.

For purposes of this section, "technical violation" means a violation of a condition of parole that is not a conviction for a new criminal offense or not determined by the state board of parole to be a commission of a new criminal offense.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 948, § 19, effective June 7.

L. 91:

(6) amended and (8) added, p. 334, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 93:

(2)(a)(VII) amended, p. 1634, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(2)(a)(I) and (3)(a)(V) amended, p. 1008, § 9, effective August 6.

L. 98:

(2)(a)(I) amended, p. 820, § 18, effective August 5.

L. 99:

(4.5) added, p. 61, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(5), (6)(b), (6)(c), (6)(d), (6)(e), and (7) amended, p. 845, § 42, effective May 24.

L. 2006:

(1) amended, p. 1054, § 6, effective May 25.

L. 2008:

(2)(a)(VIII) and (2)(a)(IX) amended, p. 658, § 8, effective April 25.

L. 2009:

(6)(d) amended, (SB 09-135), ch. 329, p. 1754, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

Entire section R&RE, (HB 10-1374), ch. 261, p. 1182, § 6, effective May 25.

L. 2011:

(6)(e) amended, (SB 11-241), ch. 200, p. 838, § 7, effective May 23.

L. 2013:

(3) amended, (SB 13-250), ch. 333, p.1934, § 50, effective October 1.

L. 2014:

(4)(a)(XI) amended, (SB 14-058), ch. 102, p. 378, § 3, effective April 7.

L. 2016:

(6)(e)(I) amended, (HB 16-1153), ch. 112, p. 317, § 1, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2006 act amending subsection (1), see section 1 of chapter 228, Session Laws of Colorado 2006.

17-22.5-404.5. Presumption of parole - drug offenders.

There shall be a presumption, subject to the final discretion of the parole board, in favor of granting parole to an inmate who has reached his or her parole eligibility date and who:

Is serving a sentence for which the controlling term of incarceration is based on a felony possession or use offense described in section 18-18-404, or section 18-18-405, C.R.S., as it existed prior to August 11, 2010;

Has not incurred a class I code of penal discipline violation within the last twelve months or a class II code of penal discipline violation within the last three months;

Is program-compliant;

Was not convicted of, and has not previously been convicted of, a felony crime described in section 18-3-303, 18-3-305, 18-3-306, or 18-6-701; sections 18-7-402 to 18-7-407; or section 18-12-102 or 18-12-109, C.R.S.; or a felony crime listed in section 24-4.1-302 (1), C.R.S.; and

Does not have an active felony or immigration detainer.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an inmate who is eligible for the presumption in subsection (1) of this section shall have a parole release hearing within ninety days after becoming eligible for the presumption in subsection (1) of this section.

If the parole board grants parole to an inmate pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the parole board shall require as a condition of parole that the parolee participate in substance abuse treatment consistent with the assessed treatment need of the parolee.

Repealed.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the discretion of the parole board in considering the statutory release guidelines in section 17-22.5-404 or the administrative release guidelines developed pursuant to section 17-22.5-107 (1) in making a decision regarding an inmate's application for release to parole.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1064), ch. 234, p. 1009, § 1, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (4), effective February 1, 2016. (See L. 2011, p. 1010.)

17-22.5-404.7. Presumption of parole - nonviolent offenders with ICE detainers.

There shall be a presumption, subject to the final discretion of the parole board, in favor of granting parole to an inmate who has reached his or her parole eligibility date and who:

Has been assessed by the Colorado risk assessment scale developed pursuant to section 17-22.5-404 (2)(a), to be medium risk or below of reoffense;

Is not serving a sentence for a felony crime described in section 18-3-303, 18-3-306, or 18-6-701, C.R.S.; sections 18-7-402 to 18-7-407, C.R.S.; or section 18-12-102 or 18-12-109, C.R.S.; section 18-17-104, C.R.S., or section 18-18-407, C.R.S.; or a felony crime listed in section 24-4.1-302 (1), C.R.S.; and

Has an active detainer lodged by the United States immigration and customs enforcement agency.

In determining whether to grant parole pursuant to provisions of subsection (1) of this section, the board shall consider the cost of incarceration to the state of Colorado in relation to the needs of further confinement of the inmate to achieve the purpose of the inmate's sentence.

The state board of parole may release an eligible inmate, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, only to the custody of the United States immigration and customs enforcement agency or other law enforcement agency with authority to execute the detainer on behalf of the United States immigration and customs enforcement agency.

If the United States immigration and customs enforcement agency withdraws the detainer or declines to take the inmate into custody, the state board of parole shall hold a recission hearing to reconsider the granting of parole to the inmate.

If the United States immigration and customs enforcement agency issues an order of deportation for the inmate, the department of corrections shall submit a request to the state board of parole to discharge parole.

A denial of parole by the state board of parole pursuant to this section shall not affect an inmate's eligibility for another form of parole or release applicable under law.

The board may consider the application for parole pursuant to the proceedings set forth in section 17-2-201 (4)(f) or 17-2-201 (9)(a).

For inmates who were parole eligible before May 23, 2011, the department shall notify the state board of parole of any of those inmates who meet the criteria listed in subsection (1) of this section, and the board shall either set a release hearing or conduct a release review within ninety days after May 23, 2011.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (SB 11-241), ch. 200, p. 838, § 8, effective May 23.

17-22.5-405. Earned time - earned release time - achievement earned time - definition.

Earned time, not to exceed ten days for each month of incarceration or parole, may be deducted from the inmate's sentence upon a demonstration to the department by the inmate, which is certified by the inmate's case manager or community parole officer, that the inmate has made consistent progress in the following categories as required by the department of corrections:

Work and training, including attendance, promptness, performance, cooperation, care of materials, and safety;

Group living, including housekeeping, personal hygiene, cooperation, social adjustment, and double bunking;

Participation in counseling sessions and involvement in self-help groups;

Progress toward the goals and programs established by the Colorado diagnostic program;

For any inmates who have been paroled, compliance with the conditions of parole release;

The offender has not harassed the victim either verbally or in writing;

The inmate has made positive progress, in accordance with performance standards established by the department, in the correctional education program established pursuant to article 32 of this title;

The inmate has shown exemplary leadership through mentoring, community service, and distinguished actions benefiting the health, safety, environment, and culture for staff and other inmates.

(1.2) Subsection (1) of this section applies to a person who was convicted as an adult for a class 1 felony committed while the person was a juvenile and who was sentenced pursuant to section 18-1.3-401 (4)(b) or (4)(c), C.R.S. As to a person who was convicted as an adult for a class 1 felony committed while the person was a juvenile and who was sentenced pursuant to section 18-1.3-401 (4)(c), C.R.S., it is the intent of the general assembly that the department award earned time to such a person both prospectively and retroactively from June 10, 2016, as if the person had been eligible to be awarded earned time from the beginning of his or her incarceration pursuant to the sentence that he or she originally received for such felony.

(1.5) (a) Earned time, not to exceed twelve days for each month of incarceration or parole, may be deducted from an inmate's sentence if the inmate:

Is serving a sentence for a class 4, class 5, or class 6 felony or level 3 or level 4 drug felony;

Has not incurred a class I code of penal discipline violation within the twenty-four months immediately preceding the time of crediting or during his or her entire term of incarceration if the term is less than twenty-four months or a class II code of penal discipline violation within the twelve months immediately preceding the time of crediting or during his or her entire term of incarceration if the term is less than twelve months;

Is program-compliant; and

Was not convicted of, and has not previously been convicted of, a felony crime described in section 18-3-303, 18-3-305, 18-3-306, or 18-6-701, sections 18-7-402 to 18-7-407, or section 18-12-102 or 18-12-109, C.R.S., or a felony crime listed in section 24-4.1-302 (1), C.R.S.

The earned time specified in subsection (1.5)(a) of this section may be deducted based upon a demonstration to the department by the inmate, which is certified by the inmate's case manager or community parole officer, that he or she has made positive progress in accordance with performance standards established by the department.

Nothing in this subsection (1.5) shall preclude an inmate from receiving earned time pursuant to subsection (1) of this section if the inmate does not qualify for earned time pursuant to this subsection (1.5).

The department shall develop objective standards for measuring consistent progress in the categories listed in subsection (1) of this section. Such standards shall be applied in all evaluations of inmates for the earned time authorized in this section.

For each inmate sentenced to the custody of the department, or for each parolee, the department shall review the performance record of the inmate or parolee and may grant, withhold, withdraw, or restore, consistent with the provisions of this section, an earned time deduction from the sentence imposed. Such review shall be conducted annually while such person is incarcerated and semiannually while such person is on parole and shall vest upon being granted. However, any earned time granted to a parolee shall vest upon completion of any semiannual review unless an administrative hearing within the department determines that such parolee engaged in criminal activity during the time period for which such earned time was granted, in which case the earned time granted during such period may be withdrawn. In addition to any other sanctions, the executive director may refer to the district attorney all cases where the offender tests positive for the presence of drugs.

(3.5) In addition to the earned time deducted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, an inmate working at a disaster site pursuant to section 17-24-124 shall be entitled to additional earned time in the amount of one day of earned time for every day spent at a disaster site.

Except as described in subsection (6) or (9) of this section or in paragraph (b) of this subsection (4), and notwithstanding any other provision of this section, earned time may not reduce the sentence of an inmate as defined in section 17-22.5-402 (1) by a period of time that is more than thirty percent of the sentence.

Earned time may not reduce the sentence of an inmate described in subsection (1.2) of this section by a period of time that is more than twenty-five percent of the sentence.

Notwithstanding subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, an offender who is sentenced and paroled for a felony offense other than a nonviolent felony committed on or after July 1, 1993, shall not be eligible to receive any earned time while the offender is on parole. An offender who is sentenced and paroled for a nonviolent felony offense committed on or after July 1, 1993, shall be eligible to receive any earned time while the offender is on parole.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (5), an offender who is sentenced for a felony committed on or after July 1, 1993, and paroled on or after January 1, 2009, shall be eligible to receive any earned time while on parole or after reparole following a parole revocation.

As used in this subsection (5), unless the context otherwise requires, a "nonviolent felony offense" means a felony offense other than a crime of violence as defined in section 18-1.3-406 (2), C.R.S., any of the felony offenses set forth in section 18-3-104, 18-4-203, or 18-4-301, C.R.S., or any felony offense committed against a child as set forth in articles 3, 6, and 7 of title 18, C.R.S.

Earned release time shall be scheduled by the state board of parole and the time computation unit in the department of corrections for inmates convicted of class 4 and class 5 felonies or level 3 drug felonies up to sixty days prior to the mandatory release date and for inmates convicted of class 6 felonies or level 4 drug felonies up to thirty days prior to the mandatory release date for inmates who meet the following criteria:

The inmate has not incurred a class I code of penal discipline violation within the twenty-four months immediately preceding the time of crediting or during his or her entire term of incarceration if the term is less than twenty-four months or a class II code of penal discipline violation within the twelve months immediately preceding the time of crediting or during his or her entire term of incarceration if the term is less than twelve months;

The inmate is program-compliant; and

The inmate was not convicted of, and has not previously been convicted of, a felony crime described in section 18-3-303, 18-3-305, 18-3-306, or 18-6-701, sections 18-7-402 to 18-7-407, or section 18-12-102 or 18-12-109, C.R.S., or a felony crime listed in section 24-4.1-302 (1), C.R.S.

Beginning in the fiscal year 2012-13, the general assembly may appropriate the savings generated by subsections (1.5) and (6) of this section to recidivism-reduction programs.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, after his or her first ninety days in administrative segregation, a state inmate in administrative segregation shall be eligible to receive earned time if he or she meets the criteria required by this section or any modified criteria developed by the department to allow a state inmate to receive the maximum amount of earned time allowable for good behavior and participation in any programs available to the state inmate in administrative segregation.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, in addition to the earned time authorized in this section, an offender who successfully completes a milestone or phase of an educational, vocational, therapeutic, or reentry program, or who demonstrates exceptional conduct that promotes the safety of correctional staff, volunteers, contractors, or other persons under the supervision of the department of corrections, may be awarded as many as sixty days of achievement earned time per program milestone or phase or per instance of exceptional conduct, at the discretion of the executive director; except that an offender shall not be awarded more than one hundred twenty days of achievement earned time pursuant to this subsection (9).

Pursuant to the intent of the general assembly in enacting House Bill 12-1223 during the 2012 regular session, the general assembly shall appropriate savings generated from the enactment of this subsection (9) to:

The education subprogram, for academic and vocational programs to offenders; and

The parole subprogram, for parole wraparound services.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a.5), the appropriation described in said subparagraph (I) must not exceed six million five hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal year.

In allocating the moneys appropriated pursuant to sub-subparagraph (B) of subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a.5), the department shall give priority to parole wraparound services that are administered based on evidence-based practices.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "exceptional conduct" includes, but is not limited to:

Saving or attempting to save the life of another person;

Aiding in the prevention of serious bodily injury or loss of life;

Providing significant assistance in the prevention of a major facility disruption;

Providing significant assistance in the solving of a cold case, as defined in section 24-4.1-302 (1.2), C.R.S.;

Acting to prevent an escape; or

Providing direct assistance in a documented facility or community emergency.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 952, § 19, effective June 7.

L. 91:

(1)(g) amended, p. 1912, § 20, effective June 1.

L. 93:

(5) added, p. 1980, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(5) amended, p. 879, § 14, effective May 24.

L. 97:

(5)(b) amended, p. 1548, § 24, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(3.5) added, p. 1452, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2002:

(5)(a) and (5)(b) amended, p. 1507, § 165, effective October 1.

L. 2008:

IP(1) amended, p. 658, § 9, effective April 25; (5)(a.5) added, p. 1756, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1.5), (6), and (7) added and (4) amended, (HB 09-1351), ch. 359, p. 1866, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2010:

(1.5)(a) and (6) amended, (HB 10-1374), ch. 261, p. 1181, § 5, effective May 25.

L. 2011:

(8) added, (SB 11-176), ch. 289, p. 1343, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(4), (5)(a), and (5)(a.5) amended and (9) added, (HB 12-1223), ch. 213, p. 916, § 2, effective May 24.

L. 2013:

(1.5)(a)(I) and IP(6) amended, (SB 13-250), ch. 333, p. 1934, § 51, effective October 1.

L. 2015:

(9)(a.5) added, (SB 15-195), ch. 279, p. 1144, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2016:

(1.2) added and (4) amended, (SB 16-181), ch. 353, p. 1450, § 4, effective June 10.

L. 2020:

IP(1) and (1.5)(b) amended and (1)(h) added, (HB 20-1019), ch. 9, p. 26, § 6, effective March 6; (1)(g) amended, (HB 20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1047, § 30, effective June 30.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsections (5)(a) and (5)(b), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002. For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act amending subsections (4), (5)(a), and (5)(a.5) and adding subsection (9), see section 1 of chapter 213, Session Laws of Colorado 2012.

17-22.5-406. Applicability of part.

This part 4 applies to all offenders sentenced for crimes committed on or after July 1, 1979.

Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the amount of earned time which may be credited pursuant to this part 4 to any inmate incarcerated on or before July 1, 1990, shall not exceed the amount of earned time actually earned by such inmate pursuant to earned time provisions in effect prior to July 1, 1990.

If the application of the provisions of this subsection (1) would result in the early discharge of any offender, the department shall refer such offender to the state board of parole which may, in its discretion, grant or deny parole using the guidelines established pursuant to section 17-22.5-404, discharge the offender or place such offender under conditional parole supervision. If the offender is placed on parole pursuant to this paragraph (c), the state board of parole may revoke the parole granted to such inmate for a period not to exceed the amount of earned time granted to the offender pursuant to this part 4.

Nothing in this subsection (1) shall be construed as a mandate to the state board of parole to release any inmate.

If any inmate incarcerated prior to June 7, 1990, has not accrued any earned time prior to such date, the provisions of law in effect at the time of such inmate's sentencing shall apply to such inmate in determining such inmate's discharge date.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, no offender incarcerated on June 7, 1990, shall be released pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section unless the department of corrections makes a written certification that the offender has met the conditions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) and at least two additional of the following criteria:

The offender has not used controlled substances, except pursuant to the prescription of a physician, for at least one year prior to such certification.

The offender has engaged in a satisfactory participation in available educational programs during his incarceration.

The offender has engaged in a satisfactory participation in any treatment programs indicated in his diagnostic evaluation.

The offender has had no serious infractions of the penal code of discipline for at least two years.

The offender has had an exemplary work record while being incarcerated under the custody of the department of corrections.

This part 4 shall not apply to any offender who is presently incarcerated who does not meet the appropriate criteria stated in subsection (2) of this section. Any such offender's sentence shall be governed by provisions in existence prior to June 7, 1990.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire part added, p. 953, § 19, effective June 7.

L. 98:

(4) repealed, p. 727, § 11, effective May 18.